District of Columbia statutes.
44-951.03

Not-for-Profit Hospital Corporation Fund.

(a)

(1)

There is established as a nonlapsing fund the Not-for-Profit Hospital Corporation Fund. The Fund shall be comprised of:

(A)

Accounts receivable of the Corporation;

(B)

Transferred funds of the United Medical Center; and

(C)

Funds obtained through payments from third-party payers, and other sources.

(2)

The Mayor may direct the Chief Financial Officer to deposit in the Fund any and all other funds received by or on behalf of the Corporation or the hospital for the purpose of operating the Corporation, the hospital, and any other operations conducted by or through the Corporation on the site.

(3)

All funds deposited into the Fund, and any interest earned on those funds, shall not revert to the unrestricted fund balance of the General Fund of the District of Columbia at the end of a fiscal year, or at any other time, but shall be continually available for the uses and purposes set forth in subsection (b) of this section without regard to fiscal year limitation, subject to authorization by Congress.

(b)

Disbursements from the Fund may be used for all purposes related to operating the Corporation, the hospital, and other operations on the site, and to purchase for the general public for educational or promotional events and programs sponsored or organized by the Corporation, including the Corporation’s Marketing/Public Relations department:

(1)

Food;

(2)

Snacks;

(3)

Nonalcoholic beverages; and

(4)

Marketing and promotional items and gifts.

Sept. 14, 2011, D.C. Law 19-21, § 5114, 58 DCR 6226
Sept. 20, 2012, D.C. Law 19-168, § 5032(a), 59 DCR 8025
The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-168 added “and to purchase for the general public for educational or promotional events and programs sponsored or organized by the Corporation, including the Corporation’s Marketing/Public Relations department” in the introductory language of (b); and added (b)(1) through (b)(4).
This section is referenced in § 44-951.01.